Illinois, session 104th, HB2387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Sections 3-100 and 63-812 as follows: 7    (405 ILCS 5/3-100)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-100)8    Sec. 3-100. Jurisdiction over involuntary admissions. 9    (a) The circuit court has jurisdiction under this Chapter 10over persons not charged with a felony who are subject to 11involuntary admission. 12    (b) The circuit court has jurisdiction over all persons 13who are subject to involuntary admission on an outpatient 14basis under Article VII-A of this Chapter. This subsection (b) 15is inoperative on and after January 1, 2030. 16    (c) Inmates of penal institutions shall not be considered 17as charged with a felony within the meaning of this Chapter. 18Court proceedings under Article VIII of this Chapter may be 19instituted as to any such inmate at any time within 90 days 20prior to discharge of such inmate by expiration of sentence or 21otherwise, and if such inmate is found to be subject to 22involuntary admission, the order of the court ordering 23hospitalization or other disposition shall become effective at   HB2387 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08542 KTG 18594 b1the time of discharge of the inmate from penal custody. 2    (d) The circuit court has jurisdiction over all persons 3alleged to be in need of treatment under Section 2-107.1 of 4this Code, whether or not they are charged with a felony. 5(Source: P.A. 99-179, eff. 7-29-15.) 6    (405 ILCS 5/3-812)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-812)7    Sec. 3-812. Court ordered admission on an outpatient 8basis; modification; revocation.9    (a) If a respondent is found subject to involuntary 10admission on an outpatient basis, the court may issue an 11order: (i) placing the respondent in the care and custody of a 12relative or other person willing and able to properly care for 13him or her; or (ii) committing the respondent to alternative 14treatment at a community mental health provider. 15    (b) An order placing the respondent in the care and 16custody of a relative or other person shall specify the powers 17and duties of the custodian. Unless the respondent is charged 18with a felony, an An order of care and custody entered pursuant 19to this Section may grant the custodian the authority to 20consent to the admission of admit a respondent to a hospital if 21the respondent fails to comply with the conditions of the 22order. If necessary in order to obtain the hospitalization of 23the respondent, the custodian may apply to the court for an 24order authorizing an officer of the peace to take the 25respondent into custody and transport the respondent to a   HB2387 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08542 KTG 18594 b1mental health facility. The provisions of Section 3-605 shall 2govern the transportation of the respondent to a mental health 3facility, except to the extent that those provisions are 4inconsistent with this Section. No person admitted to a 5hospital pursuant to this subsection shall be detained for 6longer than 24 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and 7holidays, unless, within that period, a petition for 8involuntary admission on an inpatient basis and a certificate 9supporting such petition have been filed as provided in 10Section 3-611. 11    (c) Alternative treatment shall not be ordered unless the 12program being considered is capable of providing adequate and 13humane treatment in the least restrictive setting which is 14appropriate to the respondent's condition. The court shall 15have continuing authority to modify an order for alternative 16treatment if the recipient fails to comply with the order or is 17otherwise found unsuitable for alternative treatment. Prior to 18modifying such an order, the court shall receive a report from 19the facility director of the program specifying why the 20alternative treatment is unsuitable. The recipient shall be 21notified and given an opportunity to respond when modification 22of the order for alternative treatment is considered. If the 23court determines that the respondent has violated the order 24for alternative treatment in the community or that alternative 25treatment in the community will no longer provide adequate 26assurances for the safety of the respondent or others, the   HB2387 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08542 KTG 18594 b1court may revoke the order for alternative treatment in the 2community and may order a peace officer to take the recipient 3into custody and transport him to an inpatient mental health 4facility. The provisions of Section 3-605 shall govern the 5transportation of the respondent to a mental health facility, 6except to the extent that those provisions are inconsistent 7with this Section. No person admitted to a hospital pursuant 8to this subsection shall be detained for longer than 24 hours, 9excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, unless, within 10that period, a petition for involuntary admission on an 11inpatient basis and a certificate supporting such petition 12have been filed as provided in Section 3-611.13    (d) Noncompliance with an order placing the respondent in 14the care and custody of a relative or other person willing and 15able to properly care for him or her or committing the 16respondent to alternative treatment at a community mental 17health provider shall not be a basis for a finding of contempt. 18(Source: P.A. 98-221, eff. 1-1-14.) 19    Section 10. The Clerks of Courts Act is amended by 20changing Section 27.1c as follows: 21    (705 ILCS 105/27.1c)22    Sec. 27.1c. Assessment report.23    (a) Not later than March 1, 2022, and March 1 of every year 24thereafter, the clerk of the circuit court shall submit to the   HB2387 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08542 KTG 18594 b1Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts an annual report 2for the period January 1 through December 31 of the previous 3year. The report shall contain, with respect to each of the 4 4categories of civil cases established by the Supreme Court 5pursuant to Section 27.1b of this Act:6        (1) the total number of cases that were filed;7        (2) the amount of filing fees that were collected 8    pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 27.1b;9        (3) the amount of appearance fees that were collected 10    pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 27.1b;11        (4) the amount of fees collected pursuant to 12    subsection (b-5) of Section 27.1b;13        (5) the amount of filing fees collected for 14    counterclaims or third party complaints pursuant to 15    subsection (c) of Section 27.1b;16        (6) the nature and amount of any fees collected 17    pursuant to subsection (y) of Section 27.1b; and18        (7) the number of cases for which, pursuant to Section 19    5-105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, there were waivers 20    of fees, costs, and charges of 25%, 50%, 75%, or 100%, 21    respectively, and the associated amount of fees, costs, 22    and charges that were waived.23    (b) The Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts shall 24publish the reports submitted under this Section on its 25website. 26    (c) (Blank).   HB2387 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08542 KTG 18594 b1    (c-5) Not later than March 1, 2026, and March 1 of every 2year thereafter, the clerk of the circuit court shall submit 3to the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts a report 4for the previous calendar year containing the total number of 5petitions filed asserting that a person is subject to 6involuntary admission on an outpatient basis pursuant to 7Section 3-751 of the Mental Health and Developmental 8Disabilities Code. This subsection (c-5) is inoperative on and 9after January 1, 2030. 10(Source: P.A. 101-645, eff. 6-26-20; 102-145, eff. 7-23-21.)